apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
    <pardef n="/el_vuesu__prn">
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>vuesu</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>vuestru</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>vuesa</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>vuestra</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>lo<b/>vueso</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>lo<b/>vuestro</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>vuesos</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>vuestros</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>vueses</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>vuestres</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Asturies__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="qué__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quién__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cuánt/o__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l> 
        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="conmigo__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="contigo__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="consigo__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sí__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vós__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nós__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ust/é__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>edes</l> 
        <r>é<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é</l> 
        <r>é<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nosotr/os__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vosotr/os__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/él__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elles</l> 
        <r>él<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ella</l> 
        <r>él<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ellos</l> 
        <r>él<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>él</l> 
        <r>él<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elli</l> 
        <r>él<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ello</l> 
        <r>él<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="nt"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="me__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="te__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="se__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nos__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vos__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/o__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="-y__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-yos</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>-ys</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-y</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e r="LR" lm="vusté"><i>vust</i><par n="ust/é__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el vuesu"><par n="/el_vuesu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="yo"><i>yo</i><par n="conmigo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tu"><i>tu</i><par n="contigo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="consigo"><i>consigo</i><par n="consigo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sí"><i>sí</i><par n="sí__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="él"><par n="/él__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nosotros"><i>nosotr</i><par n="nosotr/os__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nós"><i>nós</i><par n="nós__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vosotros"><i>vosotr</i><par n="vosotr/os__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vós"><i>vós</i><par n="vós__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="qué"><i>qué</i><par n="qué__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="quién"><i>quién</i><par n="quién__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="cuánto"><i>cuánto</i><par n="cuánt/o__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nos"><i>nos</i><par n="nos__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vos"><i>vos</i><par n="vos__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="lo"><i>l</i><par n="l/o__prn"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="le"><i>le</i><par n="-y__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el vuesu"><par n="/el_vuesu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="yo"><i>yo</i><par n="conmigo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tu"><i>tu</i><par n="contigo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="consigo"><i>consigo</i><par n="consigo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sí"><i>sí</i><par n="sí__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="él"><par n="/él__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nosotros"><i>nosotr</i><par n="nosotr/os__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nós"><i>nós</i><par n="nós__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vosotros"><i>vosotr</i><par n="vosotr/os__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vós"><i>vós</i><par n="vós__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="usté"><i>ust</i><par n="ust/é__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="qué"><i>qué</i><par n="qué__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="quién"><i>quién</i><par n="quién__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="cuánto"><i>cuánto</i><par n="cuánt/o__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="me"><i>me</i><par n="me__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="te"><i>te</i><par n="te__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="se__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nos"><i>nos</i><par n="nos__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vos"><i>vos</i><par n="vos__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="lo"><i>l</i><par n="l/o__prn"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="le"><i>le</i><par n="-y__prn"/></e>
    <e><i>Llaviana</i><par n="Asturies__np"/></e>
    <e><i>Sobrescobiu</i><par n="Asturies__np"/></e>
    <e><i>Rumanía</i><par n="Asturies__np"/></e>
    <e lm="yo"><i>yo</i><par n="conmigo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tu"><i>tu</i><par n="contigo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="consigo"><i>consigo</i><par n="consigo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sí"><i>sí</i><par n="sí__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nosotros"><i>nosotr</i><par n="nosotr/os__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nós"><i>nós</i><par n="nós__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vosotros"><i>vosotr</i><par n="vosotr/os__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vós"><i>vós</i><par n="vós__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="usté"><i>ust</i><par n="ust/é__prn"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="vusté"><i>vust</i><par n="ust/é__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="qué"><i>qué</i><par n="qué__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="quién"><i>quién</i><par n="quién__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="cuánto"><i>cuánto</i><par n="cuánt/o__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="me"><i>me</i><par n="me__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="te"><i>te</i><par n="te__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="se__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el vuesu"><par n="/el_vuesu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="yo"><i>yo</i><par n="conmigo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tu"><i>tu</i><par n="contigo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="consigo"><i>consigo</i><par n="consigo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sí"><i>sí</i><par n="sí__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="él"><par n="/él__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nosotros"><i>nosotr</i><par n="nosotr/os__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nós"><i>nós</i><par n="nós__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vosotros"><i>vosotr</i><par n="vosotr/os__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vós"><i>vós</i><par n="vós__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="qué"><i>qué</i><par n="qué__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="quién"><i>quién</i><par n="quién__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="cuánto"><i>cuánto</i><par n="cuánt/o__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nos"><i>nos</i><par n="nos__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vos"><i>vos</i><par n="vos__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="lo"><i>l</i><par n="l/o__prn"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="le"><i>le</i><par n="-y__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el vuesu"><par n="/el_vuesu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="me"><i>me</i><par n="me__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="te"><i>te</i><par n="te__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="se__prn"/></e>
    <e><i>Les<b/>Regueres</i><par n="Asturies__np"/></e>
